Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-642.01
Sales outlet location; qualification standards; notice to department; license; application; renewal.

(1) Prior to a county, city, village, or lottery operator conducting a lottery at a location other than the location of the lottery operator (a) the county, city, or village shall, by ordinance or resolution, establish qualification standards which shall be met by any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation seeking to have its location qualify as an authorized sales outlet location for conducting a lottery and (b) the county, city, or village shall approve or disapprove each sales outlet location and individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which desires to conduct the lottery at its sales outlet location solely on the basis of the qualification standards. A copy of the ordinance or resolution setting forth the qualification standards shall be filed with the department within thirty days of its adoption. A county, city, or village shall notify the department of all approved lottery locations within thirty days of approval.

(2) An authorized sales outlet location shall obtain a license issued by the department prior to conducting any lottery activity at such location pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act. An applicant for a license as an authorized sales outlet location shall apply on a form prescribed by the department containing the information the department deems necessary, including documentation that reflects that the location has been approved by the county, city, or village in accordance with the qualification standards required by this section. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number.

(3) The information required by this section shall be kept current and a new application shall be filed with the department if any information on the application is no longer correct.

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 64;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 119;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 70;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 56.